Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-3910
Tax Commissioner; agreement with
financial institution authorized; report.

The Tax Commissioner may enter into an
agreement with one or more financial institutions in this state to levy upon
personal property belonging to a taxpayer in accordance with the Uniform State
Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act and in any medium and format to
which the Tax Commissioner and the financial institution have agreed. The
Tax Commissioner shall issue a report to the Revenue Committee of the Legislature,
the Clerk of the Legislature, and the Governor by November 1, 2015, containing
the Tax Commissioner's preliminary findings regarding implementation of this
section and recommendations for any needed changes. The report submitted to
the committee and to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2014, LB33, § 1.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.